Massachusetts, session 194th, H4995.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 15 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the fifth paragraph and inserting in place 
thereof the following paragraph:- 
(5) If the attorney general or a district attorney becomes aware of a final conviction of a 
member of a retirement system under circumstances which may require forfeiture of the 
member’s rights to a pension, retirement allowance or return of accumulated total deductions 
pursuant to this chapter, section 58 or 59 of chapter 30 or section 25 of chapter 268A, the 
attorney general or district attorney shall immediately notify the commission of such conviction; 
provided, however, that the commission shall not report such conviction to the member’s 
retirement board or employer unless the commission: (i) has determined that the conviction 
requires forfeiture of that member’s rights to a pension, retirement allowance or return of 
accumulated total deductions pursuant to this chapter, section 58 or 59 of chapter 30 or section 
25 of chapter 268A; and (ii) is directing that member’s retirement board or employer to take 
action to effectuate such forfeiture.